Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6232.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. There shall be a special legislative commission to study the 
commonwealth’s system of local property taxes. The commission shall: (i) explore how 
municipalities could reduce or phase out parts of the property tax system; (ii) examine how the 
commonwealth could increase local aid to cities and towns to help communities reduce 
dependence on local property taxes without undermining local services; (iii) consider the effect 
on such a reduction or phase out on taxpayers, property owners, business owners, municipalities 
and local services and other stakeholders; (iv) and study any other matters the commission deems 
relevant.  
SECTION 2. The commission shall consist of 13 members: the house and senate chairs 
of the joint committee on revenue or their designees; 1 member of the house who shall be 
appointed by the speaker of the house; 1 member of the senate who shall be appointed by the 
senate president; 1 member of the house who shall be appointed by the house minority leader; 

of 2 13 and 1 member of the senate who shall be appointed by the senate minority leader; 1 member 
appointed by the Massachusetts Municipal Association, Inc. as its representative; 1 member 
appointed by the Massachusetts Taxpayers Foundation, Inc. as its representative; 1 representative 
of the department of revenue, to be appointed by the commissioner of revenue; and 4 members to 
be appointed by the governor, who shall have expertise in tax policy or municipal budgeting.  
SECTION 3. The commission shall hold no fewer than 3 public hearings to gather input 
from stakeholders and advocates, including taxpayers, municipal officials, tax policy experts, 
budgeting experts, homeowners, business owners and state officials. The commission shall hold 
the public hearings in geographically diverse locations around the commonwealth. 
SECTION 4. Not later than June 30, 2027, the commission shall submit a report on its 
findings, together with any recommendations for legislative or policy changes, to the clerks of 
the house of representatives and the senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means 
and the joint committee on revenue.